cs: Konstrukce herny: Domek na hraní na zemi; Hrací dům na kůlech; Dům na stromě; Jiné
ro-RO: Design căsuță de joacă: Casă de jucărie pe podea; Casă de jucărie pe stâlpi; Casă în copac; Altele
lt-LT: Žaidimų namelio dizainas: Pastatomas žaidimų namelis; Žaidimų namelis ant stulpų; Namas medyje; Kita
fr: Conception de la maison de jeu: Cabane sur pied; Cabane sur poteaux; Cabane dans les arbres; Autre
nl: Ontwerp speelhuis: Op vloer staand speelhuis; Speelhuis op palen; Boomhut; Andere
fi: Leikkimökin muotoilu: Lattialla seisova leikkimökki; Pylväiden varassa oleva leikkimökki; Puumaja; Muu
pl: Projekt domku zabaw: Domek na podłodze; Domek zabaw na palach; Domek na drzewie; Inne
th: การออกแบบบ้านเด็กเล่น: บ้านเด็กเล่นตั้งพื้น; บ้านเด็กเล่นยกสูง; บ้านต้นไม้; อื่นๆ
el: Σχεδιασμός παιδότοπου: Επιδαπέδιος παιδότοπος; Παιδότοπος σε στύλους; Δεντρόσπιτο; Άλλο
en: Playhouse design: Floorstanding playhouse; Playhouse on poles; Tree house; Other
sv: Lekstugekonstruktion: Golvstående lekstuga; Lekstuga på stolpar; Trädhus; Övrigt
de: Design des Spielhauses: Standspielhaus; Spielhaus auf Pfählen; Baumhaus; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Dizajn domčeka na hranie: Podlahový domček na hranie; Dom na hranie na stĺpoch; Dom na strome; Iné
da: Design af legehus: Gulvstående legehus; Legehus på pæle; Træhus; Andet
ja: プレイハウスの種類: 床置きプレイハウス; 高床式プレイハウス; ツリーハウス; その他
pt-BR: Formato da casa de bonecas: Tendas infantis; Casinha hasteada; Casa na árvore; Outro
bg-BG: Дизайн на къща за игра: Къщичка за игра на пода; Къщичка за игра на стълбове; Къщичка на дърво; Други
es: Diseño de casa de juegos: Casa de juegos en el suelo; Casa de juegos sobre postes; Casa del árbol; Otros
it: Design della casetta per bambini: Casetta da gioco per pavimento; Casetta su pali; Casa sull'albero; Altro
tr: Oyun evi tasarımı: Yerde duran oyun evi; Direk üzerinde duran oyun evi; Ağaç ev; Diğer
hu: Játszóház kialakítása: Padlón álló játszóház; Oszlopokon álló játszóház; Faház; Egyéb
zh-CN: 剧场设计: 落地式剧场; 户外柱游戏屋; 树屋; 其他
ru: Конструкция игрового домика: Напольный игровой домик; Игровой домик на столбах; Домик на дереве; Другой
ko: 장난감 집 디자인: 플로어스탠딩 극장; 기둥 위 극장; 나무 위의 집; 기타
vi: Thiết kế nhà vui chơi: Nhà chơi đứng của trẻ em; Nhà vui chơi có cột chống; Nhà trên cây; Khác
nb: Design av lekehus: Gulvstående lekehus; Lekehus på stolper; Trehytte; Annet
pt-PT: Design de casinha de brincar: Casa de brincar de chão; Casa de brincar com postes; Casa na árvore; Outro
zh-TW: 遊戲屋設計: 落地式遊戲屋; 桿上遊戲屋; 樹屋; 其他
hr-HR: Dizajn kućice za igru: Podna kućica za igru; Kućica za igru na stupovima; Kućica na drvetu; Ostalo
sl-SI: Oblikovanje igralne hišice: Talna igralna hiška; Igralna hiška na palicah; Hiša na drevesu; Drugo